srcV2/esu.lexc
LEXICON DemAdv2Ter
DemAdv;
[DemAdv]-–qlikacaar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–q̲likacaar(ar*)  NounPostbase; ! one that is the farthest in the area denoted by N
[DemAdv]-–qlir*[N→N]:%<–q̲lir*             NounPostbase; ! the one located far in the area or space or time denoted by N
[DemAdv]-–qsig[N→V]:%<–q̲sig               VerbPostbase; ! to be far in the direction denoted by N
[DemAdv]-–qsigi[N→V]:%<–q̲sigi             VerbPostbase; ! to get farther into the area denoted by N
[DemAdv]-–qva[N→N]:%<–q̲va                 NounPostbase; ! area far in the direction of N
[DemAdv]-–qvaar*[N→N]:%<–q̲vaar*           NounPostbase; ! area far in the direction of N
[DemAdv]-[Sec_Ter]:%<.tmun                EncliticOrEnd;
[DemAdv]-[Sec_Ter]–tmurte¹[N→V]:%<.tmurte VerbPostbase; ! to go N-ward; to go in the area described by V


LEXICON DemAdv
[DemAdv]-[Loc]:%<.ni                       EncliticOrEnd;
[DemAdv]-[Ter]:%<.vet                      EncliticOrEnd;
[DemAdv]-[Abl]:%<.ken                      EncliticOrEnd;
[DemAdv]-[Via]:%<.ggun                     EncliticOrEnd;
[DemAdv]-=i[Encl]:%<=i                     EncliticOrEnd; ! used with demonstrative adverb bases to form exclamations that operate as “verbal pointers” or “predicative demonstrative forms”
![DemAdv]-[Loc]ete[N→V]:%<%%~nete°         VerbPostbase;
[DemAdv]-[Loc]ete[N→V]:%<('a)+nte°        VerbPostbase;
[DemAdv]-+var[N→V]:%<+var                 VerbPostbase; ! to go or put N-ward
[DemAdv]-[Ter]+virte[N→V]:%<.virte         VerbPostbase; ! to go to N
[DemAdv]-[Via]+gguir[N→V]:%<.gguir         VerbPostbase; ! to go by way of N; to go through N


LEXICON Positional
aci                    PositionalPostbase; ! area below; area under (positional base used only with a possessed ending); mattress; bed; wild potato Hedysarum sp. (additional LI meaning)
aki                    PositionalPostbase; ! other side; area across; reponse; equivalent; value; coin; money
akulaᵉ:akule           PositionalPostbase; ! midsection; area between; land between two topographical features such as the river and the ocean; tundra
caniq:canir            PositionalPostbase; ! area beside; space next to
ciu                    PositionalPostbase; ! area in front (of it); time preceding (it); bow of a boat; forepart
elataᵉ:elate           PositionalPostbase; ! area outside of
ilu                    PositionalPostbase; ! interior; area inside; upriver area; inner feelings; intestinal tract
kelu                   PositionalPostbase; ! area behind, back from the house and away from the river
ketaᵉ:kete             PositionalPostbase; ! area down toward the river or sea; area away from the wall; area down from and in front
kingu                  PositionalPostbase; ! rear; back part; area behind; stern; time after
manu                   PositionalPostbase; ! front side of something
pai²:pai               PositionalPostbase; ! mouth of river; outlet; opening of den, bottle, etc., cockpit of kayak
qai                    PositionalPostbase; ! surface; top
qulaᵉ:qule             PositionalPostbase; ! area above; ten; ten in cards
tungaᵉ:tunge           PositionalPostbase; ! direction of; area toward
tunu                   PositionalPostbase; ! back of; area in back of

amataᵉ:amate           NounInflection; ! area behind; area beyond; area on the far side
au͡gataᵉ:au͡gate         NounInflection; ! area around (positional base); one of a pair of tassels on the sides of the piece of calfskin in the middle of a tradional Yupʼik parka
avataᵉ:avate           NounInflection; ! area around (positional base); one of a pair of tassels on the sides of the piece of calfskin in the middle of a tradional Yupʼik parka
kiataᵉ:kiate           NounInflection; ! area up river of –; inside area of — (house of the like)
uataᵉ:uate             NounInflection; ! area downriver or toward the exit from possessor
ukataᵉ:ukate           NounInflection; ! this side # ukatiini ‘on this side of itʼ
yaataᵉ:yaate           NounInflection; ! area beyond


LEXICON PositionalPostbase
NounInflection;
-%:(ng)ir²[N→V]:%<%:(ng)ir               VerbPostbase; ! to deprive or be deprived of N; to remove N from; to un-V; to pass through the N area of (it)
-–lirner[N→N]:%<–lirner                  NounPostbase; ! area in the N direction; one of the N direction
-–qlikacaar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–q̲likacaar(ar*)  NounPostbase; ! one that is the farthest in the area denoted by N
-–qlir*[N→N]:%<–q̲lir*                    NounPostbase; ! the one located far in the area or space or time denoted by N
-–qsig[N→V]:%<–q̲sig                      VerbPostbase; ! to be far in the direction denoted by N
-–qsigi[N→V]:%<–q̲sigi                    VerbPostbase; ! to get farther into the area denoted by N
-–qva[N→N]:%<–q̲va                        NounPostbase; ! area far in the direction of N
-–qvaar*[N→N]:%<–q̲vaar*                  NounPostbase; ! area far in the direction of N
-[Sec_Ter]:%<.tmun                       EncliticOrEnd;
–[Sec_Ter]–tmurte¹[N→V]:%<.tmurte        VerbPostbase;
-+var[N→V]:%<+var                        VerbPostbase; ! to go or put N-ward


LEXICON NumeralPostbase
[Num]:                      NounPostbase;
[Num]-–qlir*[N→N]:%<–q̲lir*    NounPostbase; ! the one located far in the area or space or time denoted by N
[Num]-–rqu[N→N]:%<–r̲qu        NounPostbase; ! N times
[Num]-–rqu[N→N]:%<–rqu        NounPostbase; ! N times


LEXICON EncliticOrEnd
#;
-=am[Encl]:%<=am       EncliticOrEnd; ! used for emphasis or contrast in narrative or conversation
-=amta[Encl]:%<=amta   EncliticOrEnd; ! again
-=ata[Encl]:%<=ata     EncliticOrEnd; ! look in bases section; may be treated as either a particle base or an enclitic
-=atam[Encl]:%<=atam   EncliticOrEnd; ! look in bases section; may be treated as either a particle base or an enclitic
-=gga[Encl]:%<=gga     EncliticOrEnd; ! see =wa
-=ggem[Encl]:%<=ggem   EncliticOrEnd; ! indeed
-=gguq[Encl]:%<=gguq   EncliticOrEnd; ! one said; it is said
-=ima[Encl]:%<=ima     EncliticOrEnd; ! look in bases section; may be treated as either a particle base or an enclitic
-=kin[Encl]:%<=kin     EncliticOrEnd; ! I wish
-=kiq[Encl]:%<=kiq     EncliticOrEnd; ! I wonder # used to form rhetorical questions
-=llam[Encl]:%<=llam   EncliticOrEnd; ! alas; I wish it were not so
-=lli[Encl]:%<=lli     EncliticOrEnd; ! oh!; gee whiz!
-=llu[Encl]:%<=llu     EncliticOrEnd; ! and; also
-=mi[Encl]:%<=mi       EncliticOrEnd; ! on the other hand; how about?; but
-=naa[Encl]:%<=naa     EncliticOrEnd; ! intensifier
-=qaa[Encl]:%<=qaa     EncliticOrEnd; ! used with the indicative mood to form ‘yes-noʼ questions; also occurs independently as an exclamatory particle (see in bases section)
-=tanem[Encl]:%<=tanem EncliticOrEnd; ! look in bases section; may be treated as either a particle base or an enclitic
-=tang[Encl]:%<=tang   EncliticOrEnd; ! look in bases section; may be treated as either a particle base or an enclitic
-=tuq[Encl]:%<=tuq     EncliticOrEnd; ! I wish; I hope
-=wa[Encl]:%<=wa       EncliticOrEnd; ! used when answering questions with a verb in the consequential mood, when making statements where the verb is understood from context (usually with the same verbal idea as a preceding sentence), and for making statements involving probability where the verb is in the participial mood with the postbase -lli- ‘maybeʼ (that construction calls for this enclitic); thus, this enclitic implies that there is more involved than that which is explicitly stated;
-=gga[Encl]:%<=gga     EncliticOrEnd; ! (HBC, NI form) used when answering questions with a verb in the consequential mood, when making statements where the verb is understood from context (usually with the same verbal idea as a preceding sentence), and for making statements involving probability where the verb is in the participial mood with the postbase -lli- ‘maybeʼ (that construction calls for this enclitic); thus, this enclitic implies that there is more involved than that which is explicitly stated;

LEXICON Exceptions
wataime-+(a)r[N→V]-[V][Intrg][Intr][S_3Sg]:wataim%<+arta    EncliticOrEnd; ! what time is it?
apa-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]:apa%<+'urlur*                           EncliticOrEnd;
tutgar(aq*)-–r(ur)lur*[N→N]:tutgara%<+'urlur*               EncliticOrEnd;
LEXICON Ignorative
ki[Ignorative]-[Abs][SgUnpd]-–lkug[N→N]:ki%<+na%<–lkug       EncliticOrEnd; ! no-good, darned N
ki[Ignorative]-[Loc][SgUnpd]:kitu%<.mi                   EncliticOrEnd;
ki[Ignorative]-[Abs][PlUnpd]:kinku%<.t                  EncliticOrEnd; ! who plural
ki[Ignorative]-[Abl_Mod][PlUnpd]:kinku%<.nek            EncliticOrEnd;
ki[Ignorative]-[Ter][PlUnpd]:kinku%<.nun                EncliticOrEnd;
ki[Ignorative]-[Equ][PlUnpd]:kinku%<.cetun              EncliticOrEnd;
na[Ignorative]-[Sec_Ter]:na%<.tmun                 EncliticOrEnd; ! to where?
na[Ignorative]-[Via]:na%<.gg'un                    EncliticOrEnd;
na[Ignorative]-%:~(ng)u[N→V]-=wa[Encl]:na%<.u%<.gga                  EncliticOrEnd; ! where is it, he, she? ! used with demonstrative adverb bases to form exclamations that operate as “verbal pointers” or “predicative demonstrative forms”
qaku[Ignorative]:qaku                           EncliticOrEnd; ! when? (in the future); how long from now?; a certain unspecified (or unspecifiable) time afterward;
LEXICON Demonstrative
ava              DemAdv2Ter; yaa             DemAdv2Ter;  ama                   DemAdv; 
agaa             DemAdv2Ter; ika              DemAdv2Ter; akma                  DemAdv;
ii               DemAdv2Ter;                                                         
pava               DemAdv2Ter; pia                DemAdv2Ter; pama                  DemAdv; 
pagaa            DemAdv2Ter; pika               DemAdv2Ter; pakma                    DemAdv; 
pii              DemAdv2Ter;
qava             DemAdv2Ter;   kia                DemAdv2Ter; qama                 DemAdv; 
qagaa            DemAdv2Ter; kegga             DemAdv2Ter; qakma                 DemAdv; 
qii              DemAdv2Ter;
una              DemAdv2Ter; kana             DemAdv2Ter; cama                  DemAdv;
un[DemPro]-[Voc][SgUnpd]:un@+yuuq    EncliticOrEnd;  
un'ga              DemAdv2Ter; ua               DemAdv2Ter; cakma                    DemAdv; 
un'gaa             DemAdv2Ter;
maa              DemAdv2Ter; wa                   DemAdv; 
                                                          ima                   DemAdv;
wa[DemAdv]-[Via]:u+u+ggun             EncliticOrEnd;                                                          
tamaa              DemAdv2Ter; tua                  DemAdv;  
                               tava                 DemAdv;
tava[DemAdv]-[Equ]:tava+ten                  EncliticOrEnd;
taima          EncliticOrEnd;
uka                 DemAdv2Ter;  
LEXICON Numeral
malrur[Num]-[Cardinal][Du]:malruk                            EncliticOrEnd;
arvinleg[Num]-[Cardinal][Pl]:arvinlegen                      EncliticOrEnd;
akimiarunritar(ar*)[Num]-[Cardinal][Sg]:akimiarunritar(ar*)  EncliticOrEnd;
cetamar[Num]-[Cardinal][Pl]:cetamat                          EncliticOrEnd;
qulngunritar(ar*)[Num]-[Cardinal][Pl]:qulngunritaraan        EncliticOrEnd;
yuinaunritar(ar*)[Num]-[Cardinal][Pl]:yuinaunritaraan        EncliticOrEnd;
tiissitsaar[Num]-[Cardinal][Du]:tiissitsaak                  EncliticOrEnd;
ataucir                 NumeralPostbase; ! 1
malrur                  NumeralPostbase; ! 2
pingayur                NumeralPostbase; ! 3
cetamar                 NumeralPostbase; ! 4
tallimar                NumeralPostbase; ! 5
arvinleg                NumeralPostbase; ! 6
malrunleg               NumeralPostbase; ! 7
pingayunleg             NumeralPostbase; ! 8
qulngunritar(ar*)       NumeralPostbase; ! 9
qule                    NumeralPostbase; ! 10
akimiarunritar(ar*)     NumeralPostbase; ! 14
akimiar                 NumeralPostbase; ! 15
yuinaunritar(ar*)       NumeralPostbase; ! 19
ipiarunritar(ar*)       NumeralPostbase; ! 19
yuinar*                 NumeralPostbase; ! 20
ipiar                   NumeralPostbase; ! 20
tiissitsaar             NumeralPostbase; ! Thousand
